Washington statutes.
RCW 27.15.060

Dissolution of library capital facility area.

(1) A library capital facility area may be dissolved by a majority vote of the governing body when all obligations under any general obligation bonds issued by the library capital facility area have been discharged and any other contractual obligations of the library capital facility area have either been discharged or assumed by another governmental entity.

(2) A library capital facility area shall be dissolved by the governing body if the first two ballot propositions under RCW 27.15.050 that are submitted to voters are not approved.

[ 1995 c 368 s 7.]